Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 7. Hunting and Trapping in State Forests.

§ 10.1-1151.
Necessity for permits.

No person shall hunt or trap in this Commonwealth on any lands which are under the jurisdiction and control of the Department by virtue of purchase, gift, lease or otherwise, and are administered as state forests, without first obtaining, in addition to other licenses and permits required by law, special use permits required by the State Forester pursuant to this article.

History.

Code 1950, § 10-68; 1986, c. 567; 1988, c. 891.

§ 10.1-1152.
State Forester may require permits and fees.

The State Forester is authorized to require any person who engages in certain activities authorized by regulations promulgated by the Department on any of the lands described in §

10.1-1151

to obtain a special use permit. A special use permit to engage in these activities on any such lands shall be issued for a fee established by regulations promulgated by the Department.

The State Forester is also authorized to enter into an agreement with the Department of Wildlife Resources under which the Department of Wildlife Resources will include permits required under subsection A in its program for the sale of permits and licenses by the means and to the extent authorized by § 29.1-327.

History.

Code 1950, § 10-69; 1984, c. 715; 1986, cc. 539, 567; 1988, c. 891; 1993, c. 260; 2006, c. 13; 2007, c. 646; 2009, c. 297; 2012, c. 484; 2014, c. 141; 2020, c. 958.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, c. 484, cl. 2, provides: “That the Department of Forestry shall promulgate emergency regulations to implement the provisions of this act that establish a fee for the special use permit to become effective within 280 days of the enactment of this act. Until the effective date of such regulation a fee not to exceed $15 shall be charged for the issuance of a special use permit as required under §

10.1-1152

of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2014, c. 141, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Forestry shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment. Until the effective date of such regulations, a fee not to exceed $15 shall be charged for the issuance of a special use permit for hunting, fishing, trapping, riding bikes, and riding horses.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 13 substituted “$15” for “ten dollars” in the last two sentences.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 646 designated the existing provisions as subsection A; and added subsection B.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 297, in subsection A, in the first sentence, substituted “fishes, traps, rides mountain bikes, or rides horses” for “or traps” and deleted “or special use permits” from the end; in the second sentence, substituted “A special use permit to engage in these activities” for “Permits to hunt” and deleted “for each permit” following “not to exceed $15 annually.”

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 484, in subsection A, in the first sentence, deleted “with the approval of the Board” following “is authorized” and “mountain” preceding “bikes” and combined the former next-to-last and last sentences by substituting “established by regulations promulgated by the Department” for “not to exceed $15 annually, as fixed by the State Forester. Permits to trap on such lands may be issued in combination with the hunting permits, or separately, at a fee not to exceed $15 annually for each such permit, to be fixed by the State Forester.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 141, in subsection A, substituted “engages in certain activities authorized by regulations promulgated by the Department” for “hunts, fishes, traps, rides bikes, or rides horses” in the first sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958, substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” twice in subsection B.

§ 10.1-1153.
Limitations on rights of holders of permits.

Each special use permit shall entitle the holder to hunt and trap, or to trap, in and upon such lands of the state forests as shall be determined by the State Forester and designated on the permit, subject to all other applicable provisions of law or regulations of the Department of Wildlife Resources and to such further conditions and restrictions for safeguarding the state forests as may be imposed by the State Forester and indicated on the permit. In addition to the other provisions of law applicable to hunting and trapping on the lands of the Commonwealth, the State Forester is authorized to impose such restrictions and conditions upon hunting and trapping in the state forests as he deems proper. No such restriction or condition shall be effective for the permit holder unless the restriction or condition is written, printed, stamped or otherwise indicated on the permit.

History.

Code 1950, § 10-70; 1986, c. 567; 1988, c. 891; 2020, c. 958.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958, substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries” in the first sentence.

§§ 10.1-1154,
10.1-1155.
Repealed by Acts 2007, c. 646, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

10.1-1154

, pertaining to issuance of permits and collection of fees; form of permit, was derived from Code 1950, § 10-71; 1986, cc. 539, 567; 1988, c. 891. Former § 10.1-1155, pertaining to collections to be paid into state treasury; reports to the Department of Forestry, was derived from Code 1950, § 10-72; 1986, c. 567; 1988, c. 891; 2004, c. 58.

§ 10.1-1156.
Funds credited to Department; disbursements.

All funds paid into the state treasury pursuant to §

10.1-1152

shall be credited to the Department and maintained in the Reforestation Operations Fund to be expended annually, in the following order:

From the annual gross receipts, there shall be paid the costs of preparing and issuing the permits, including compensation to the Department of Wildlife Resources, which is authorized to sell state forest special use permits;

The remainder may be expended by the State Forester for operation and management in such state forests. All funds expended by the State Forester in the development, management, and protection of the game resources in state forests shall be in cooperation with the Department of Wildlife Resources.

History.

Code 1950, § 10-73; 1986, c. 567; 1988, c. 891; 2007, c. 646; 2012, cc. 197, 248; 2020, c. 958.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 646 substituted “§

10.1-115

2” for “§

10.1-115

,” in the introductory paragraph; deleted “in each respective county, which shall be credited to the general fund of such county” at the end of subdivision 1; substituted “to the Department of Game and Inland Fisheries, which is” for “of the clerks or other persons” in subdivision 2; and deleted “and under the direction of” preceding “the Department” in subdivision 3.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 197 and 248 are identical, and deleted former subdivision 1 and redesignated the following subdivisions accordingly; in subdivision 1, substituted “From the annual gross receipts, there” for “From the balance remaining after providing for such payments to the counties annual gross receipts, there” at the beginning, and “to sell state forest special use permits” for “to sell hunting and trapping permits” at the end; and in subdivision 2, substituted “for operation and management” for “for game and forest management” in the first sentence; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 958, in subdivision 1 and in subdivision 2, second sentence, substituted “Department of Wildlife Resources” for “Department of Game and Inland Fisheries.”

§ 10.1-1157.
Punishment for violations.

Any person who hunts or traps in violation of any provision of this article, or in violation of restrictions and conditions imposed by the State Forester pursuant to the provisions of §

10.1-1153

shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 10-74; 1986, cc. 539, 567; 1988, c. 891; 2010, c. 8.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 8 substituted “Class 3 misdemeanor” for “Class 1 misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished accordingly.”